Utah statutes.
78B-7-207.   Forms and assistance -- No fees.

(1)  The Administrative Office of the Courts shall adopt and make available uniform forms for petitions and orders conforming to this part.  The forms shall notify the petitioner that:

(a)  a knowing falsehood in any statement under oath may subject the petitioner to felony prosecution;

(b)  the petitioner may provide a copy of the order to the principal of the minor's school; and

(c)  the petitioner may enforce a court order through the court if the respondent violates or fails to comply with a provision of the order.

(2)  If the petitioner is not represented, the clerk of the court shall provide, directly or through an agent:

(a)  the forms adopted pursuant to Subsection (1);

(b)  clerical assistance in completing the forms and filing the petition;

(c)  information regarding means for service of process;

(d)  a list of organizations with telephone numbers that may represent the petitioner; and

(e)  information regarding the procedure for transporting a jailed or imprisoned respondent to hearings, including transportation order forms when necessary.

(3)  No fee may be imposed by a court, constable, or law enforcement agency for:

(a)  filing a petition under this chapter;

(b)  obtaining copies necessary for service or delivery to law enforcement officials; or

(c)  service of a petition, ex parte child protective order, or child protective order.

